Illinois, session 104th, HB4343.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended by 5adding Sections 9.47 and 9.48 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 205/9.47 new)7    Sec. 9.47. Guaranteed admission pathway program.8    (a) The Board shall establish a pathway program in which 9any public high school student in this State who graduates in 10the top 10% of the student's high school graduating class or 11meets other standardized thresholds, as determined by the 12Board, is guaranteed admission to at least one public 13university.14    (b) The Board shall adopt all rules necessary to carry out 15its responsibilities under this Section.  16    (110 ILCS 205/9.48 new)17    Sec. 9.48. Admission, tuition, and retention report. The 18Board shall submit an annual report to the General Assembly 19that includes all of the following information with respect to 20public universities:21        (1) How many in-state residents were admitted in the 22    prior academic year compared to the number of out-of-state   HB4343- 2 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    residents that were admitted.2        (2) The tuition trends for students who are residents 3    of this State.4        (3) How many university graduates continue to reside 5    within this State following graduation.6    The Board shall make this report publicly available. 7    Section 10. The University of Illinois Act is amended by 8changing Sections 8 and 25 as follows: 9    (110 ILCS 305/8)  (from Ch. 144, par. 29)10    Sec. 8. Admissions. 11    (a) (Blank).12    (b) No new student shall be admitted to instruction in any 13of the departments or colleges of the University unless such 14student also has satisfactorily completed:15        (1) at least 15 units of high school coursework from 16    the following 5 categories:17            (A) 4 years of English (emphasizing written and 18        oral communications and literature), of which up to 2 19        years may be collegiate level instruction;20            (B) 3 years of social studies (emphasizing history 21        and government);22            (C) 3 years of mathematics (introductory through 23        advanced algebra, geometry, trigonometry, or 24        fundamentals of computer programming);  HB4343- 3 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1            (D) 3 years of science (laboratory sciences or 2        agricultural sciences); and3            (E) 2 years of electives in foreign language 4        (which may be deemed to include American Sign 5        Language), music, career and technical education, 6        agricultural education, or art;7        (2) except that institutions may admit individual 8    applicants if the institution determines through 9    assessment or through evaluation based on learning 10    outcomes of the coursework taken, including career and 11    technical education courses and courses taken in a charter 12    school established under Article 27A of the School Code, 13    that the applicant demonstrates knowledge and skills 14    substantially equivalent to the knowledge and skills 15    expected to be acquired in the high school courses 16    required for admission. The Board of Trustees of the 17    University of Illinois shall not discriminate in the 18    University's admissions process against an applicant for 19    admission because of the applicant's enrollment in a 20    charter school established under Article 27A of the School 21    Code. Institutions may also admit 1) applicants who did 22    not have an opportunity to complete the minimum college 23    preparatory curriculum in high school, and 2) 24    educationally disadvantaged applicants who are admitted to 25    the formal organized special assistance programs that are 26    tailored to the needs of such students, providing that in   HB4343- 4 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    either case, the institution incorporates in the 2    applicant's baccalaureate curriculum courses or other 3    academic activities that compensate for course 4    deficiencies; and5        (3) except that up to 3 of the 15 units of coursework 6    required by paragraph (1) of this subsection may be 7    distributed by deducting no more than one unit each from 8    the categories of social studies, mathematics, sciences 9    and electives and completing those 3 units in any of the 5 10    categories of coursework described in paragraph (1).11    (c) When allocating funds, local boards of education shall 12recognize their obligation to their students to offer the 13coursework required by subsection (b).14    (d) A student who has graduated from high school and has 15scored within the University's accepted range on the ACT or 16SAT shall not be required to take a high school equivalency 17test as a prerequisite to admission.18    (e) The Board of Trustees shall establish an admissions 19process in which honorably discharged veterans are permitted 20to submit an application for admission to the University as a 21freshman student enrolling in the spring semester if the 22veteran was on active duty during the fall semester. The 23University may request that the Department of Veterans Affairs 24confirm the status of an applicant as an honorably discharged 25veteran who was on active duty during the fall semester.26    (f) Beginning with the 2025-2026 academic year, the   HB4343- 5 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1University shall provide all Illinois students transferring 2from a public community college in this State with the 3University's undergraduate transfer admissions application fee 4waiver policy and, if such a policy exists, any application or 5forms necessary to apply for a fee waiver as part of the 6University's transfer admissions process. The University is 7encouraged to develop a policy to automatically waive the 8undergraduate transfer admissions application fee for 9low-income Illinois students transferring from a public 10community college in this State. The University shall post 11this policy in an easily accessible place on the University's 12Internet website.13    (g) With respect to each academic program of the 14University that has a limited capacity to admit students due 15to a high demand for admission to the program, at least 70% of 16the students admitted to the program must be residents of this 17State.18(Source: P.A. 103-936, eff. 8-9-24; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 19    (110 ILCS 305/25)20    Sec. 25. Tuition increase limitations Limitation on 21tuition increase.22    (a) This subsection (a) Section applies only to those 23students who first enroll after the 2003-2004 academic year. 24For 4 continuous academic years following initial enrollment 25(or for undergraduate programs that require more than 4 years   HB4343- 6 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1to complete, for the normal time to complete the program, as 2determined by the University), the tuition charged an 3undergraduate student who is an Illinois resident shall not 4exceed the amount that the student was charged at the time he 5or she first enrolled in the University. However, if the 6student changes majors during this time period, the tuition 7charged the student shall equal the amount the student would 8have been charged had he or she been admitted to the changed 9major when he or she first enrolled. An undergraduate student 10who is an Illinois resident and who has for 4 continuous 11academic years been charged no more than the tuition amount 12that he or she was charged at the time he or she first enrolled 13in the University shall be charged tuition not to exceed the 14amount the University charged students who first enrolled in 15the University for the academic year following the academic 16year the student first enrolled in the University for a 17maximum of 2 additional continuous academic years.18    (b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, the Board 19of Trustees may not increase the in-state tuition rate for a 20given academic year by a percentage that exceeds the 21percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for 22All Urban Consumers for all items published by the Bureau of 23Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for 24the 12 months ending on the previous December 31.25(Source: P.A. 96-1293, eff. 7-26-10.)   HB4343- 7 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    Section 15. The Southern Illinois University Management 2Act is amended by changing Sections 8e and 15 as follows: 3    (110 ILCS 520/8e)  (from Ch. 144, par. 658e)4    Sec. 8e. Admissions. 5    (a) No new student shall be admitted to instruction in any 6of the departments or colleges of the University unless such 7student also has satisfactorily completed:8        (1) at least 15 units of high school coursework from 9    the following 5 categories:10            (A) 4 years of English (emphasizing written and 11        oral communications and literature), of which up to 2 12        years may be collegiate level instruction;13            (B) 3 years of social studies (emphasizing history 14        and government);15            (C) 3 years of mathematics (introductory through 16        advanced algebra, geometry, trigonometry, or 17        fundamentals of computer programming);18            (D) 3 years of science (laboratory sciences or 19        agricultural sciences); and20            (E) 2 years of electives in foreign language 21        (which may be deemed to include American Sign 22        Language), music, career and technical education, 23        agricultural education, or art; 24        (2) except that institutions may admit individual 25    applicants if the institution determines through   HB4343- 8 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    assessment or through evaluation based on learning 2    outcomes of the coursework taken, including career and 3    technical education courses and courses taken in a charter 4    school established under Article 27A of the School Code, 5    that the applicant demonstrates knowledge and skills 6    substantially equivalent to the knowledge and skills 7    expected to be acquired in the high school courses 8    required for admission. The Board of Trustees of Southern 9    Illinois University shall not discriminate in the 10    University's admissions process against an applicant for 11    admission because of the applicant's enrollment in a 12    charter school established under Article 27A of the School 13    Code. Institutions may also admit 1) applicants who did 14    not have an opportunity to complete the minimum college 15    preparatory curriculum in high school, and 2) 16    educationally disadvantaged applicants who are admitted to 17    the formal organized special assistance programs that are 18    tailored to the needs of such students, providing that in 19    either case, the institution incorporates in the 20    applicant's baccalaureate curriculum courses or other 21    academic activities that compensate for course 22    deficiencies; and23        (3) except that up to 3 of 15 units of coursework 24    required by paragraph (1) of this subsection may be 25    distributed by deducting no more than one unit each from 26    the categories of social studies, mathematics, sciences   HB4343- 9 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    and electives and completing those 3 units in any of the 5 2    categories of coursework described in paragraph (1).3    (b) When allocating funds, local boards of education shall 4recognize their obligation to their students to offer the 5coursework required by subsection (a).6    (c) A student who has graduated from high school and has 7scored within the University's accepted range on the ACT or 8SAT shall not be required to take a high school equivalency 9test as a prerequisite to admission.10    (d) The Board shall establish an admissions process in 11which honorably discharged veterans are permitted to submit an 12application for admission to the University as a freshman 13student enrolling in the spring semester if the veteran was on 14active duty during the fall semester. The University may 15request that the Department of Veterans Affairs confirm the 16status of an applicant as an honorably discharged veteran who 17was on active duty during the fall semester.18    (e) Beginning with the 2025-2026 academic year, the 19University shall provide all Illinois students transferring 20from a public community college in this State with the 21University's undergraduate transfer admissions application fee 22waiver policy and, if such a policy exists, any application or 23forms necessary to apply for a fee waiver as part of the 24University's transfer admissions process. The University is 25encouraged to develop a policy to automatically waive the 26undergraduate transfer admissions application fee for   HB4343- 10 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1low-income Illinois students transferring from a public 2community college in this State. The University shall post 3this policy in an easily accessible place on the University's 4Internet website.5    (f) With respect to each academic program of the 6University that has a limited capacity to admit students due 7to a high demand for admission to the program, at least 70% of 8the students admitted to the program must be residents of this 9State.10(Source: P.A. 103-936, eff. 8-9-24; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 11    (110 ILCS 520/15)12    Sec. 15. Tuition increase limitations Limitation on 13tuition increase.14    (a) This subsection (a) Section applies only to those 15students who first enroll after the 2003-2004 academic year. 16For 4 continuous academic years following initial enrollment 17(or for undergraduate programs that require more than 4 years 18to complete, for the normal time to complete the program, as 19determined by the University), the tuition charged an 20undergraduate student who is an Illinois resident shall not 21exceed the amount that the student was charged at the time he 22or she first enrolled in the University. However, if the 23student changes majors during this time period, the tuition 24charged the student shall equal the amount the student would 25have been charged had he or she been admitted to the changed   HB4343- 11 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1major when he or she first enrolled. An undergraduate student 2who is an Illinois resident and who has for 4 continuous 3academic years been charged no more than the tuition amount 4that he or she was charged at the time he or she first enrolled 5in the University shall be charged tuition not to exceed the 6amount the University charged students who first enrolled in 7the University for the academic year following the academic 8year the student first enrolled in the University for a 9maximum of 2 additional continuous academic years.10    (b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, the Board 11may not increase the in-state tuition rate for a given 12academic year by a percentage that exceeds the percentage 13increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 14Consumers for all items published by the Bureau of Labor 15Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the 12 16months ending on the previous December 31.17(Source: P.A. 96-1293, eff. 7-26-10.) 18    Section 20. The Chicago State University Law is amended by 19changing Sections 5-85 and 5-120 as follows: 20    (110 ILCS 660/5-85)21    Sec. 5-85. Admissions. 22    (a) No new student shall be admitted to instruction in any 23of the departments or colleges of the Chicago State University 24unless such student also has satisfactorily completed:  HB4343- 12 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1        (1) at least 15 units of high school coursework from 2    the following 5 categories:3            (A) 4 years of English (emphasizing written and 4        oral communications and literature), of which up to 2 5        years may be collegiate level instruction;6            (B) 3 years of social studies (emphasizing history 7        and government);8            (C) 3 years of mathematics (introductory through 9        advanced algebra, geometry, trigonometry, or 10        fundamentals of computer programming);11            (D) 3 years of science (laboratory sciences or 12        agricultural sciences); and13            (E) 2 years of electives in foreign language 14        (which may be deemed to include American Sign 15        Language), music, career and technical education, 16        agricultural education, or art; 17        (2) except that Chicago State University may admit 18    individual applicants if it determines through assessment 19    or through evaluation based on learning outcomes of the 20    coursework taken, including career and technical education 21    courses and courses taken in a charter school established 22    under Article 27A of the School Code, that the applicant 23    demonstrates knowledge and skills substantially equivalent 24    to the knowledge and skills expected to be acquired in the 25    high school courses required for admission. The Board of 26    Trustees of Chicago State University shall not   HB4343- 13 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    discriminate in the University's admissions process 2    against an applicant for admission because of the 3    applicant's enrollment in a charter school established 4    under Article 27A of the School Code. Chicago State 5    University may also admit (i) applicants who did not have 6    an opportunity to complete the minimum college preparatory 7    curriculum in high school, and (ii) educationally 8    disadvantaged applicants who are admitted to the formal 9    organized special assistance programs that are tailored to 10    the needs of such students, providing that in either case, 11    the institution incorporates in the applicant's 12    baccalaureate curriculum courses or other academic 13    activities that compensate for course deficiencies; and14        (3) except that up to 3 of 15 units of coursework 15    required by paragraph (1) of this subsection may be 16    distributed by deducting no more than one unit each from 17    the categories of social studies, mathematics, sciences 18    and electives and completing those 3 units in any of the 5 19    categories of coursework described in paragraph (1).20    (b) When allocating funds, local boards of education shall 21recognize their obligation to their students to offer the 22coursework required by subsection (a).23    (c) A student who has graduated from high school and has 24scored within the University's accepted range on the ACT or 25SAT shall not be required to take a high school equivalency 26test as a prerequisite to admission.  HB4343- 14 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    (d) The Board shall establish an admissions process in 2which honorably discharged veterans are permitted to submit an 3application for admission to the University as a freshman 4student enrolling in the spring semester if the veteran was on 5active duty during the fall semester. The University may 6request that the Department of Veterans Affairs confirm the 7status of an applicant as an honorably discharged veteran who 8was on active duty during the fall semester.9    (e) Beginning with the 2025-2026 academic year, the 10University shall provide all Illinois students transferring 11from a public community college in this State with the 12University's undergraduate transfer admissions application fee 13waiver policy and, if such a policy exists, any application or 14forms necessary to apply for a fee waiver as part of the 15University's transfer admissions process. The University is 16encouraged to develop a policy to automatically waive the 17undergraduate transfer admissions application fee for 18low-income Illinois students transferring from a public 19community college in this State. The University shall post 20this policy in an easily accessible place on the University's 21Internet website.22    (f) With respect to each academic program of the 23University that has a limited capacity to admit students due 24to a high demand for admission to the program, at least 70% of 25the students admitted to the program must be residents of this 26State.  HB4343- 15 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1(Source: P.A. 103-936, eff. 8-9-24; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 2    (110 ILCS 660/5-120)3    Sec. 5-120. Tuition increase limitations Limitation on 4tuition increase.5    (a) This subsection (a) Section applies only to those 6students who first enroll after the 2003-2004 academic year. 7For 4 continuous academic years following initial enrollment 8(or for undergraduate programs that require more than 4 years 9to complete, for the normal time to complete the program, as 10determined by the University), the tuition charged an 11undergraduate student who is an Illinois resident shall not 12exceed the amount that the student was charged at the time he 13or she first enrolled in the University. However, if the 14student changes majors during this time period, the tuition 15charged the student shall equal the amount the student would 16have been charged had he or she been admitted to the changed 17major when he or she first enrolled. An undergraduate student 18who is an Illinois resident and who has for 4 continuous 19academic years been charged no more than the tuition amount 20that he or she was charged at the time he or she first enrolled 21in the University shall be charged tuition not to exceed the 22amount the University charged students who first enrolled in 23the University for the academic year following the academic 24year the student first enrolled in the University for a 25maximum of 2 additional continuous academic years.  HB4343- 16 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    (b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, the Board 2may not increase the in-state tuition rate for a given 3academic year by a percentage that exceeds the percentage 4increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 5Consumers for all items published by the Bureau of Labor 6Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the 12 7months ending on the previous December 31.8(Source: P.A. 96-1293, eff. 7-26-10.) 9    Section 25. The Eastern Illinois University Law is amended 10by changing Sections 10-85 and 10-120 as follows: 11    (110 ILCS 665/10-85)12    Sec. 10-85. Admissions. 13    (a) No new student shall be admitted to instruction in any 14of the departments or colleges of the Eastern Illinois 15University unless such student also has satisfactorily 16completed:17        (1) at least 15 units of high school coursework from 18    the following 5 categories:19            (A) 4 years of English (emphasizing written and 20        oral communications and literature), of which up to 2 21        years may be collegiate level instruction;22            (B) 3 years of social studies (emphasizing history 23        and government);24            (C) 3 years of mathematics (introductory through   HB4343- 17 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1        advanced algebra, geometry, trigonometry, or 2        fundamentals of computer programming);3            (D) 3 years of science (laboratory sciences or 4        agricultural sciences); and5            (E) 2 years of electives in foreign language 6        (which may be deemed to include American Sign 7        Language), music, career and technical education, 8        agricultural education, or art; 9        (2) except that Eastern Illinois University may admit 10    individual applicants if it determines through assessment 11    or through evaluation based on learning outcomes of the 12    coursework taken, including career and technical education 13    courses and courses taken in a charter school established 14    under Article 27A of the School Code, that the applicant 15    demonstrates knowledge and skills substantially equivalent 16    to the knowledge and skills expected to be acquired in the 17    high school courses required for admission. The Board of 18    Trustees of Eastern Illinois University shall not 19    discriminate in the University's admissions process 20    against an applicant for admission because of the 21    applicant's enrollment in a charter school established 22    under Article 27A of the School Code. Eastern Illinois 23    University may also admit (i) applicants who did not have 24    an opportunity to complete the minimum college preparatory 25    curriculum in high school, and (ii) educationally 26    disadvantaged applicants who are admitted to the formal   HB4343- 18 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    organized special assistance programs that are tailored to 2    the needs of such students, providing that in either case, 3    the institution incorporates in the applicant's 4    baccalaureate curriculum courses or other academic 5    activities that compensate for course deficiencies; and6        (3) except that up to 3 of 15 units of coursework 7    required by paragraph (1) of this subsection may be 8    distributed by deducting no more than one unit each from 9    the categories of social studies, mathematics, sciences 10    and electives and completing those 3 units in any of the 5 11    categories of coursework described in paragraph (1).12    (b) When allocating funds, local boards of education shall 13recognize their obligation to their students to offer the 14coursework required by subsection (a).15    (c) A student who has graduated from high school and has 16scored within the University's accepted range on the ACT or 17SAT shall not be required to take a high school equivalency 18test as a prerequisite to admission.19    (d) The Board shall establish an admissions process in 20which honorably discharged veterans are permitted to submit an 21application for admission to the University as a freshman 22student enrolling in the spring semester if the veteran was on 23active duty during the fall semester. The University may 24request that the Department of Veterans Affairs confirm the 25status of an applicant as an honorably discharged veteran who 26was on active duty during the fall semester.  HB4343- 19 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    (e) Beginning with the 2025-2026 academic year, the 2University shall provide all Illinois students transferring 3from a public community college in this State with the 4University's undergraduate transfer admissions application fee 5waiver policy and, if such a policy exists, any application or 6forms necessary to apply for a fee waiver as part of the 7University's transfer admissions process. The University is 8encouraged to develop a policy to automatically waive the 9undergraduate transfer admissions application fee for 10low-income Illinois students transferring from a public 11community college in this State. The University shall post 12this policy in an easily accessible place on the University's 13Internet website.14    (f) With respect to each academic program of the 15University that has a limited capacity to admit students due 16to a high demand for admission to the program, at least 70% of 17the students admitted to the program must be residents of this 18State.19(Source: P.A. 103-936, eff. 8-9-24; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 20    (110 ILCS 665/10-120)21    Sec. 10-120. Tuition increase limitations Limitation on 22tuition increase.23    (a) This subsection (a) Section applies only to those 24students who first enroll after the 2003-2004 academic year. 25For 4 continuous academic years following initial enrollment   HB4343- 20 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1(or for undergraduate programs that require more than 4 years 2to complete, for the normal time to complete the program, as 3determined by the University), the tuition charged an 4undergraduate student who is an Illinois resident shall not 5exceed the amount that the student was charged at the time he 6or she first enrolled in the University. However, if the 7student changes majors during this time period, the tuition 8charged the student shall equal the amount the student would 9have been charged had he or she been admitted to the changed 10major when he or she first enrolled. An undergraduate student 11who is an Illinois resident and who has for 4 continuous 12academic years been charged no more than the tuition amount 13that he or she was charged at the time he or she first enrolled 14in the University shall be charged tuition not to exceed the 15amount the University charged students who first enrolled in 16the University for the academic year following the academic 17year the student first enrolled in the University for a 18maximum of 2 additional continuous academic years.19    (b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, the Board 20may not increase the in-state tuition rate for a given 21academic year by a percentage that exceeds the percentage 22increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 23Consumers for all items published by the Bureau of Labor 24Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the 12 25months ending on the previous December 31.26(Source: P.A. 96-1293, eff. 7-26-10.)   HB4343- 21 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    Section 30. The Governors State University Law is amended 2by changing Sections 15-85 and 15-120 as follows: 3    (110 ILCS 670/15-85)4    Sec. 15-85. Admissions. 5    (a) No new student shall be admitted to instruction in any 6of the departments or colleges of the Governors State 7University unless such student also has satisfactorily 8completed:9        (1) at least 15 units of high school coursework from 10    the following 5 categories:11            (A) 4 years of English (emphasizing written and 12        oral communications and literature), of which up to 2 13        years may be collegiate level instruction;14            (B) 3 years of social studies (emphasizing history 15        and government);16            (C) 3 years of mathematics (introductory through 17        advanced algebra, geometry, trigonometry, or 18        fundamentals of computer programming);19            (D) 3 years of science (laboratory sciences or 20        agricultural sciences); and21            (E) 2 years of electives in foreign language 22        (which may be deemed to include American Sign 23        Language), music, career and technical education, 24        agricultural education, or art;   HB4343- 22 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1        (2) except that Governors State University may admit 2    individual applicants if it determines through assessment 3    or through evaluation based on learning outcomes of the 4    coursework taken, including career and technical education 5    courses and courses taken in a charter school established 6    under Article 27A of the School Code, that the applicant 7    demonstrates knowledge and skills substantially equivalent 8    to the knowledge and skills expected to be acquired in the 9    high school courses required for admission. The Board of 10    Trustees of Governors State University shall not 11    discriminate in the University's admissions process 12    against an applicant for admission because of the 13    applicant's enrollment in a charter school established 14    under Article 27A of the School Code. Governors State 15    University may also admit (i) applicants who did not have 16    an opportunity to complete the minimum college preparatory 17    curriculum in high school, and (ii) educationally 18    disadvantaged applicants who are admitted to the formal 19    organized special assistance programs that are tailored to 20    the needs of such students, providing that in either case, 21    the institution incorporates in the applicant's 22    baccalaureate curriculum courses or other academic 23    activities that compensate for course deficiencies; and24        (3) except that up to 3 of 15 units of coursework 25    required by paragraph (1) of this subsection may be 26    distributed by deducting no more than one unit each from   HB4343- 23 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    the categories of social studies, mathematics, sciences 2    and electives and completing those 3 units in any of the 5 3    categories of coursework described in paragraph (1).4    (b) When allocating funds, local boards of education shall 5recognize their obligation to their students to offer the 6coursework required by subsection (a).7    (c) A student who has graduated from high school and has 8scored within the University's accepted range on the ACT or 9SAT shall not be required to take a high school equivalency 10test as a prerequisite to admission.11    (d) The Board shall establish an admissions process in 12which honorably discharged veterans are permitted to submit an 13application for admission to the University as a freshman 14student enrolling in the spring semester if the veteran was on 15active duty during the fall semester. The University may 16request that the Department of Veterans Affairs confirm the 17status of an applicant as an honorably discharged veteran who 18was on active duty during the fall semester.19    (e) Beginning with the 2025-2026 academic year, the 20University shall provide all Illinois students transferring 21from a public community college in this State with the 22University's undergraduate transfer admissions application fee 23waiver policy and, if such a policy exists, any application or 24forms necessary to apply for a fee waiver as part of the 25University's transfer admissions process. The University is 26encouraged to develop a policy to automatically waive the   HB4343- 24 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1undergraduate transfer admissions application fee for 2low-income Illinois students transferring from a public 3community college in this State. The University shall post 4this policy in an easily accessible place on the University's 5Internet website.6    (f) With respect to each academic program of the 7University that has a limited capacity to admit students due 8to a high demand for admission to the program, at least 70% of 9the students admitted to the program must be residents of this 10State.11(Source: P.A. 103-936, eff. 8-9-24; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 12    (110 ILCS 670/15-120)13    Sec. 15-120. Tuition increase limitations Limitation on 14tuition increase.15    (a) This subsection (a) Section applies only to those 16students who first enroll after the 2003-2004 academic year. 17For 4 continuous academic years following initial enrollment 18(or for undergraduate programs that require more than 4 years 19to complete, for the normal time to complete the program, as 20determined by the University), the tuition charged an 21undergraduate student who is an Illinois resident shall not 22exceed the amount that the student was charged at the time he 23or she first enrolled in the University. However, if the 24student changes majors during this time period, the tuition 25charged the student shall equal the amount the student would   HB4343- 25 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1have been charged had he or she been admitted to the changed 2major when he or she first enrolled. An undergraduate student 3who is an Illinois resident and who has for 4 continuous 4academic years been charged no more than the tuition amount 5that he or she was charged at the time he or she first enrolled 6in the University shall be charged tuition not to exceed the 7amount the University charged students who first enrolled in 8the University for the academic year following the academic 9year the student first enrolled in the University for a 10maximum of 2 additional continuous academic years.11    (b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, the Board 12may not increase the in-state tuition rate for a given 13academic year by a percentage that exceeds the percentage 14increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 15Consumers for all items published by the Bureau of Labor 16Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the 12 17months ending on the previous December 31.18(Source: P.A. 96-1293, eff. 7-26-10.) 19    Section 35. The Illinois State University Law is amended 20by changing Sections 20-85 and 20-125 as follows: 21    (110 ILCS 675/20-85)22    Sec. 20-85. Admissions. 23    (a) No new student shall be admitted to instruction in any 24of the departments or colleges of the Illinois State   HB4343- 26 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1University unless such student also has satisfactorily 2completed:3        (1) at least 15 units of high school coursework from 4    the following 5 categories:5            (A) 4 years of English (emphasizing written and 6        oral communications and literature), of which up to 2 7        years may be collegiate level instruction;8            (B) 3 years of social studies (emphasizing history 9        and government);10            (C) 3 years of mathematics (introductory through 11        advanced algebra, geometry, trigonometry, or 12        fundamentals of computer programming);13            (D) 3 years of science (laboratory sciences or 14        agricultural sciences); and15            (E) 2 years of electives in foreign language 16        (which may be deemed to include American Sign 17        Language), music, career and technical education, 18        agricultural education, or art; 19        (2) except that Illinois State University may admit 20    individual applicants if it determines through assessment 21    or through evaluation based on learning outcomes of the 22    coursework taken, including career and technical education 23    courses and courses taken in a charter school established 24    under Article 27A of the School Code, that the applicant 25    demonstrates knowledge and skills substantially equivalent 26    to the knowledge and skills expected to be acquired in the   HB4343- 27 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    high school courses required for admission. The Board of 2    Trustees of Illinois State University shall not 3    discriminate in the University's admissions process 4    against an applicant for admission because of the 5    applicant's enrollment in a charter school established 6    under Article 27A of the School Code. Illinois State 7    University may also admit (i) applicants who did not have 8    an opportunity to complete the minimum college preparatory 9    curriculum in high school, and (ii) educationally 10    disadvantaged applicants who are admitted to the formal 11    organized special assistance programs that are tailored to 12    the needs of such students, providing that in either case, 13    the institution incorporates in the applicant's 14    baccalaureate curriculum courses or other academic 15    activities that compensate for course deficiencies; and16        (3) except that up to 3 of 15 units of coursework 17    required by paragraph (1) of this subsection may be 18    distributed by deducting no more than one unit each from 19    the categories of social studies, mathematics, sciences 20    and electives and completing those 3 units in any of the 5 21    categories of coursework described in paragraph (1).22    (b) When allocating funds, local boards of education shall 23recognize their obligation to their students to offer the 24coursework required by subsection (a).25    (c) A student who has graduated from high school and has 26scored within the University's accepted range on the ACT or   HB4343- 28 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1SAT shall not be required to take a high school equivalency 2test as a prerequisite to admission.3    (d) The Board shall establish an admissions process in 4which honorably discharged veterans are permitted to submit an 5application for admission to the University as a freshman 6student enrolling in the spring semester if the veteran was on 7active duty during the fall semester. The University may 8request that the Department of Veterans Affairs confirm the 9status of an applicant as an honorably discharged veteran who 10was on active duty during the fall semester.11    (e) Beginning with the 2025-2026 academic year, the 12University shall provide all Illinois students transferring 13from a public community college in this State with the 14University's undergraduate transfer admissions application fee 15waiver policy and, if such a policy exists, any application or 16forms necessary to apply for a fee waiver as part of the 17University's transfer admissions process. The University is 18encouraged to develop a policy to automatically waive the 19undergraduate transfer admissions application fee for 20low-income Illinois students transferring from a public 21community college in this State. The University shall post 22this policy in an easily accessible place on the University's 23Internet website.24    (f) With respect to each academic program of the 25University that has a limited capacity to admit students due 26to a high demand for admission to the program, at least 70% of   HB4343- 29 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1the students admitted to the program must be residents of this 2State.3(Source: P.A. 103-936, eff. 8-9-24; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 4    (110 ILCS 675/20-125)5    Sec. 20-125. Tuition increase limitations Limitation on 6tuition increase.7    (a) This subsection (a) Section applies only to those 8students who first enroll after the 2003-2004 academic year. 9For 4 continuous academic years following initial enrollment 10(or for undergraduate programs that require more than 4 years 11to complete, for the normal time to complete the program, as 12determined by the University), the tuition charged an 13undergraduate student who is an Illinois resident shall not 14exceed the amount that the student was charged at the time he 15or she first enrolled in the University. However, if the 16student changes majors during this time period, the tuition 17charged the student shall equal the amount the student would 18have been charged had he or she been admitted to the changed 19major when he or she first enrolled. An undergraduate student 20who is an Illinois resident and who has for 4 continuous 21academic years been charged no more than the tuition amount 22that he or she was charged at the time he or she first enrolled 23in the University shall be charged tuition not to exceed the 24amount the University charged students who first enrolled in 25the University for the academic year following the academic   HB4343- 30 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1year the student first enrolled in the University for a 2maximum of 2 additional continuous academic years.3    (b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, the Board 4may not increase the in-state tuition rate for a given 5academic year by a percentage that exceeds the percentage 6increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 7Consumers for all items published by the Bureau of Labor 8Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the 12 9months ending on the previous December 31.10(Source: P.A. 96-1293, eff. 7-26-10.) 11    Section 40. The Northeastern Illinois University Law is 12amended by changing Sections 25-85 and 25-120 as follows: 13    (110 ILCS 680/25-85)14    Sec. 25-85. Admissions. 15    (a) No new student shall be admitted to instruction in any 16of the departments or colleges of the Northeastern Illinois 17University unless such student also has satisfactorily 18completed:19        (1) at least 15 units of high school coursework from 20    the following 5 categories:21            (A) 4 years of English (emphasizing written and 22        oral communications and literature), of which up to 2 23        years may be collegiate level instruction;24            (B) 3 years of social studies (emphasizing history   HB4343- 31 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1        and government);2            (C) 3 years of mathematics (introductory through 3        advanced algebra, geometry, trigonometry, or 4        fundamentals of computer programming);5            (D) 3 years of science (laboratory sciences or 6        agricultural sciences); and7            (E) 2 years of electives in foreign language 8        (which may be deemed to include American Sign 9        Language), music, career and technical education, 10        agricultural education, or art; 11        (2) except that Northeastern Illinois University may 12    admit individual applicants if it determines through 13    assessment or through evaluation based on learning 14    outcomes of the coursework taken, including career and 15    technical education courses and courses taken in a charter 16    school established under Article 27A of the School Code, 17    that the applicant demonstrates knowledge and skills 18    substantially equivalent to the knowledge and skills 19    expected to be acquired in the high school courses 20    required for admission. The Board of Trustees of 21    Northeastern Illinois University shall not discriminate in 22    the University's admissions process against an applicant 23    for admission because of the applicant's enrollment in a 24    charter school established under Article 27A of the School 25    Code. Northeastern Illinois University may also admit (i) 26    applicants who did not have an opportunity to complete the   HB4343- 32 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    minimum college preparatory curriculum in high school, and 2    (ii) educationally disadvantaged applicants who are 3    admitted to the formal organized special assistance 4    programs that are tailored to the needs of such students, 5    providing that in either case, the institution 6    incorporates in the applicant's baccalaureate curriculum 7    courses or other academic activities that compensate for 8    course deficiencies; and9        (3) except that up to 3 of 15 units of coursework 10    required by paragraph (1) of this subsection may be 11    distributed by deducting no more than one unit each from 12    the categories of social studies, mathematics, sciences 13    and electives and completing those 3 units in any of the 5 14    categories of coursework described in paragraph (1).15    (b) When allocating funds, local boards of education shall 16recognize their obligation to their students to offer the 17coursework required by subsection (a).18    (c) A student who has graduated from high school and has 19scored within the University's accepted range on the ACT or 20SAT shall not be required to take a high school equivalency 21test as a prerequisite to admission.22    (d) The Board shall establish an admissions process in 23which honorably discharged veterans are permitted to submit an 24application for admission to the University as a freshman 25student enrolling in the spring semester if the veteran was on 26active duty during the fall semester. The University may   HB4343- 33 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1request that the Department of Veterans Affairs confirm the 2status of an applicant as an honorably discharged veteran who 3was on active duty during the fall semester.4    (e) Beginning with the 2025-2026 academic year, the 5University shall provide all Illinois students transferring 6from a public community college in this State with the 7University's undergraduate transfer admissions application fee 8waiver policy and, if such a policy exists, any application or 9forms necessary to apply for a fee waiver as part of the 10University's transfer admissions process. The University is 11encouraged to develop a policy to automatically waive the 12undergraduate transfer admissions application fee for 13low-income Illinois students transferring from a public 14community college in this State. The University shall post 15this policy in an easily accessible place on the University's 16Internet website.17    (f) With respect to each academic program of the 18University that has a limited capacity to admit students due 19to a high demand for admission to the program, at least 70% of 20the students admitted to the program must be residents of this 21State.22(Source: P.A. 103-936, eff. 8-9-24; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 23    (110 ILCS 680/25-120)24    Sec. 25-120. Tuition increase limitations Limitation on 25tuition increase.  HB4343- 34 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    (a) This subsection (a) Section applies only to those 2students who first enroll after the 2003-2004 academic year. 3For 4 continuous academic years following initial enrollment 4(or for undergraduate programs that require more than 4 years 5to complete, for the normal time to complete the program, as 6determined by the University), the tuition charged an 7undergraduate student who is an Illinois resident shall not 8exceed the amount that the student was charged at the time he 9or she first enrolled in the University. However, if the 10student changes majors during this time period, the tuition 11charged the student shall equal the amount the student would 12have been charged had he or she been admitted to the changed 13major when he or she first enrolled. An undergraduate student 14who is an Illinois resident and who has for 4 continuous 15academic years been charged no more than the tuition amount 16that he or she was charged at the time he or she first enrolled 17in the University shall be charged tuition not to exceed the 18amount the University charged students who first enrolled in 19the University for the academic year following the academic 20year the student first enrolled in the University for a 21maximum of 2 additional continuous academic years.22    (b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, the Board 23may not increase the in-state tuition rate for a given 24academic year by a percentage that exceeds the percentage 25increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 26Consumers for all items published by the Bureau of Labor   HB4343- 35 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the 12 2months ending on the previous December 31.3(Source: P.A. 96-1293, eff. 7-26-10.) 4    Section 45. The Northern Illinois University Law is 5amended by changing Sections 30-85 and 30-130 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 685/30-85)7    Sec. 30-85. Admissions. 8    (a) No new student shall be admitted to instruction in any 9of the departments or colleges of the Northern Illinois 10University unless such student also has satisfactorily 11completed:12        (1) at least 15 units of high school coursework from 13    the following 5 categories:14            (A) 4 years of English (emphasizing written and 15        oral communications and literature), of which up to 2 16        years may be collegiate level instruction;17            (B) 3 years of social studies (emphasizing history 18        and government);19            (C) 3 years of mathematics (introductory through 20        advanced algebra, geometry, trigonometry, or 21        fundamentals of computer programming);22            (D) 3 years of science (laboratory sciences or 23        agricultural sciences); and24            (E) 2 years of electives in foreign language   HB4343- 36 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1        (which may be deemed to include American Sign 2        Language), music, career and technical education, 3        agricultural education, or art; 4        (2) except that Northern Illinois University may admit 5    individual applicants if it determines through assessment 6    or through evaluation based on learning outcomes of the 7    coursework taken, including career and technical education 8    courses and courses taken in a charter school established 9    under Article 27A of the School Code, that the applicant 10    demonstrates knowledge and skills substantially equivalent 11    to the knowledge and skills expected to be acquired in the 12    high school courses required for admission. The Board of 13    Trustees of Northern Illinois University shall not 14    discriminate in the University's admissions process 15    against an applicant for admission because of the 16    applicant's enrollment in a charter school established 17    under Article 27A of the School Code. Northern Illinois 18    University may also admit (i) applicants who did not have 19    an opportunity to complete the minimum college preparatory 20    curriculum in high school, and (ii) educationally 21    disadvantaged applicants who are admitted to the formal 22    organized special assistance programs that are tailored to 23    the needs of such students, providing that in either case, 24    the institution incorporates in the applicant's 25    baccalaureate curriculum courses or other academic 26    activities that compensate for course deficiencies; and  HB4343- 37 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1        (3) except that up to 3 of 15 units of coursework 2    required by paragraph (1) of this subsection may be 3    distributed by deducting no more than one unit each from 4    the categories of social studies, mathematics, sciences 5    and electives and completing those 3 units in any of the 5 6    categories of coursework described in paragraph (1).7    (b) When allocating funds, local boards of education shall 8recognize their obligation to their students to offer the 9coursework required by subsection (a).10    (c) A student who has graduated from high school and has 11scored within the University's accepted range on the ACT or 12SAT shall not be required to take a high school equivalency 13test as a prerequisite to admission.14    (d) The Board shall establish an admissions process in 15which honorably discharged veterans are permitted to submit an 16application for admission to the University as a freshman 17student enrolling in the spring semester if the veteran was on 18active duty during the fall semester. The University may 19request that the Department of Veterans Affairs confirm the 20status of an applicant as an honorably discharged veteran who 21was on active duty during the fall semester.22    (e) Beginning with the 2025-2026 academic year, the 23University shall provide all Illinois students transferring 24from a public community college in this State with the 25University's undergraduate transfer admissions application fee 26waiver policy and, if such a policy exists, any application or   HB4343- 38 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1forms necessary to apply for a fee waiver as part of the 2University's transfer admissions process. The University is 3encouraged to develop a policy to automatically waive the 4undergraduate transfer admissions application fee for 5low-income Illinois students transferring from a public 6community college in this State. The University shall post 7this policy in an easily accessible place on the University's 8Internet website.9    (f) With respect to each academic program of the 10University that has a limited capacity to admit students due 11to a high demand for admission to the program, at least 70% of 12the students admitted to the program must be residents of this 13State.14(Source: P.A. 103-936, eff. 8-9-24; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 15    (110 ILCS 685/30-130)16    Sec. 30-130. Tuition increase limitations Limitation on 17tuition increase.18    (a) This subsection (a) Section applies only to those 19students who first enroll after the 2003-2004 academic year. 20For 4 continuous academic years following initial enrollment 21(or for undergraduate programs that require more than 4 years 22to complete, for the normal time to complete the program, as 23determined by the University), the tuition charged an 24undergraduate student who is an Illinois resident shall not 25exceed the amount that the student was charged at the time he   HB4343- 39 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1or she first enrolled in the University. However, if the 2student changes majors during this time period, the tuition 3charged the student shall equal the amount the student would 4have been charged had he or she been admitted to the changed 5major when he or she first enrolled. An undergraduate student 6who is an Illinois resident and who has for 4 continuous 7academic years been charged no more than the tuition amount 8that he or she was charged at the time he or she first enrolled 9in the University shall be charged tuition not to exceed the 10amount the University charged students who first enrolled in 11the University for the academic year following the academic 12year the student first enrolled in the University for a 13maximum of 2 additional continuous academic years.14    (b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, the Board 15may not increase the in-state tuition rate for a given 16academic year by a percentage that exceeds the percentage 17increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 18Consumers for all items published by the Bureau of Labor 19Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the 12 20months ending on the previous December 31.21(Source: P.A. 96-1293, eff. 7-26-10.) 22    Section 50. The Western Illinois University Law is amended 23by changing Sections 35-85 and 35-125 as follows: 24    (110 ILCS 690/35-85)  HB4343- 40 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    Sec. 35-85. Admissions. 2    (a) No new student shall be admitted to instruction in any 3of the departments or colleges of the Western Illinois 4University unless such student also has satisfactorily 5completed:6        (1) at least 15 units of high school coursework from 7    the following 5 categories:8            (A) 4 years of English (emphasizing written and 9        oral communications and literature), of which up to 2 10        years may be collegiate level instruction;11            (B) 3 years of social studies (emphasizing history 12        and government);13            (C) 3 years of mathematics (introductory through 14        advanced algebra, geometry, trigonometry, or 15        fundamentals of computer programming);16            (D) 3 years of science (laboratory sciences or 17        agricultural sciences); and18            (E) 2 years of electives in foreign language 19        (which may be deemed to include American Sign 20        Language), music, career and technical education, 21        agricultural education, or art; 22        (2) except that Western Illinois University may admit 23    individual applicants if it determines through assessment 24    or through evaluation based on learning outcomes of the 25    coursework taken, including career and technical education 26    courses and courses taken in a charter school established   HB4343- 41 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    under Article 27A of the School Code, that the applicant 2    demonstrates knowledge and skills substantially equivalent 3    to the knowledge and skills expected to be acquired in the 4    high school courses required for admission. The Board of 5    Trustees of Western Illinois University shall not 6    discriminate in the University's admissions process 7    against an applicant for admission because of the 8    applicant's enrollment in a charter school established 9    under Article 27A of the School Code. Western Illinois 10    University may also admit (i) applicants who did not have 11    an opportunity to complete the minimum college preparatory 12    curriculum in high school, and (ii) educationally 13    disadvantaged applicants who are admitted to the formal 14    organized special assistance programs that are tailored to 15    the needs of such students, providing that in either case, 16    the institution incorporates in the applicant's 17    baccalaureate curriculum courses or other academic 18    activities that compensate for course deficiencies; and19        (3) except that up to 3 of 15 units of coursework 20    required by paragraph (1) of this subsection may be 21    distributed by deducting no more than one unit each from 22    the categories of social studies, mathematics, sciences 23    and electives and completing those 3 units in any of the 5 24    categories of coursework described in paragraph (1).25    (b) When allocating funds, local boards of education shall 26recognize their obligation to their students to offer the   HB4343- 42 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1coursework required by subsection (a).2    (c) A student who has graduated from high school and has 3scored within the University's accepted range on the ACT or 4SAT shall not be required to take a high school equivalency 5test as a prerequisite to admission.6    (d) The Board shall establish an admissions process in 7which honorably discharged veterans are permitted to submit an 8application for admission to the University as a freshman 9student enrolling in the spring semester if the veteran was on 10active duty during the fall semester. The University may 11request that the Department of Veterans Affairs confirm the 12status of an applicant as an honorably discharged veteran who 13was on active duty during the fall semester.14    (e) Beginning with the 20245-2026 academic year, the 15University shall provide all Illinois students transferring 16from a public community college in this State with the 17University's undergraduate transfer admissions application fee 18waiver policy and, if such a policy exists, any application or 19forms necessary to apply for a fee waiver as part of the 20University's transfer admissions process. The University is 21encouraged to develop a policy to automatically waive the 22undergraduate transfer admissions application fee for 23low-income Illinois students transferring from a public 24community college in this State. The University shall post 25this policy in an easily accessible place on the University's 26Internet website.  HB4343- 43 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1    (f) With respect to each academic program of the 2University that has a limited capacity to admit students due 3to a high demand for admission to the program, at least 70% of 4the students admitted to the program must be residents of this 5State.6(Source: P.A. 103-936, eff. 8-9-24; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 7    (110 ILCS 690/35-125)8    Sec. 35-125. Tuition increase limitations Limitation on 9tuition increase.10    (a) This subsection (a) Section applies only to those 11students who first enroll after the 2003-2004 academic year. 12For 4 continuous academic years following initial enrollment 13(or for undergraduate programs that require more than 4 years 14to complete, for the normal time to complete the program, as 15determined by the University), the tuition charged an 16undergraduate student who is an Illinois resident shall not 17exceed the amount that the student was charged at the time he 18or she first enrolled in the University. However, if the 19student changes majors during this time period, the tuition 20charged the student shall equal the amount the student would 21have been charged had he or she been admitted to the changed 22major when he or she first enrolled. An undergraduate student 23who is an Illinois resident and who has for 4 continuous 24academic years been charged no more than the tuition amount 25that he or she was charged at the time he or she first enrolled   HB4343- 44 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1in the University shall be charged tuition not to exceed the 2amount the University charged students who first enrolled in 3the University for the academic year following the academic 4year the student first enrolled in the University for a 5maximum of 2 additional continuous academic years.6    (b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, the Board 7may not increase the in-state tuition rate for a given 8academic year by a percentage that exceeds the percentage 9increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 10Consumers for all items published by the Bureau of Labor 11Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the 12 12months ending on the previous December 31.13(Source: P.A. 96-1293, eff. 7-26-10.) 14    Section 55. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 15amended by adding Section 65.135 as follows: 16    (110 ILCS 947/65.135 new)17    Sec. 65.135. Illinois workforce incentive program.18    (a) The Commission shall establish a workforce incentive 19program in which a student who enrolls in a high-need field at 20an institution, as designated by the Commission, may receive a 21grant to reduce tuition costs or loan forgiveness if the 22student commits to working in this State for at least 3 after 23graduation. Under the program, a student from an underserved 24region of this State may also receive additional admission and   HB4343- 45 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1tuition support from the Commission, based on criteria 2developed by the Commission.3    (b) The Commission shall adopt all rules necessary to 4carry out its responsibilities under this Section.   HB4343- 46 -LRB104 16928 LNS 30342 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    110 ILCS 205/9.47 new4    110 ILCS 205/9.48 new5    110 ILCS 305/8from Ch. 144, par. 296    110 ILCS 305/257    110 ILCS 520/8efrom Ch. 144, par. 658e8    110 ILCS 520/159    110 ILCS 660/5-8510    110 ILCS 660/5-12011    110 ILCS 665/10-8512    110 ILCS 665/10-12013    110 ILCS 670/15-8514    110 ILCS 670/15-12015    110 ILCS 675/20-8516    110 ILCS 675/20-12517    110 ILCS 680/25-8518    110 ILCS 680/25-12019    110 ILCS 685/30-8520    110 ILCS 685/30-13021    110 ILCS 690/35-8522    110 ILCS 690/35-12523    110 ILCS 947/65.135 new